Ohio, session 136, HB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.502 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.502. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the interchange of the roads known as interstate route number four hundred seventy-five and Dorr street, in Lucas county, shall be known as the "Keith G. Earley Memorial Interchange." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers at the interchange indicating its name.